Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-529
School districts; additional expenses; appropriations.

Any school district impacted by a project approved under the Nebraska Redevelopment Act, the Invest Nebraska Act, or the Quality Jobs Act may file with the governing body an estimate of the amount of additional expenses of the school district as a result of the project which is in excess of amounts compensated by additional valuation or state aid. The governing body may appropriate funds to the school district to compensate for all or part of the impact.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 29;

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 46.

Invest Nebraska Act, see section 77-5501.

Quality Jobs Act, see section 77-4901.